Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 11
OLDER COLORADANS' ACT

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 7 of chapter 119, C.R.S. 1963. This article was repealed in 1968 and was subsequently recreated and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1968, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Law reviews:

For article, "The Older Americans Act: What Every Elder Law Attorney Needs to Know", see 42

C

olo. Law. 41 (May 2013).

Section

PART 1 COLORADO COMMISSION ON THE AGING

PART 2 STATE OFFICE ON AGING

PART 3 LIFELONG COLORADO INITIATIVE